North Dakota, session 69, SB2162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-13-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-13-15. Assessment.
An assessment at the rate of fifteenthirty mills per bushel [35.24 liters] by weight is imposed
upon all wheat:
1. All wheat grownGrown in this state, at the time of its sale;
2. All wheat deliveredDelivered into this state, at the time of its sale; and
3. All wheat soldSold through commercial channels to a first purchaser in this state.
Page No. 1 25.0617.01000